Utah statutes.
34-28-19.   Retaliation prohibited -- Administrative process -- Enforcement
-- Rulemaking.
(1) (a)  An employer violates this chapter if the employer takes an action
described in Subsection (1)(b) against an employee because:
(i)  the employee files a complaint or testifies in a proceeding relative to
the enforcement of this chapter;
(ii)  the employee is going to file a complaint or testify in a proceeding
relative to the enforcement of this chapter; or
(iii)  the employer believes that the employee may file a complaint or testify
in any proceeding relative to the enforcement of this chapter.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies to the following actions of an employer:
(i)  the discharge of an employee;
(ii)  the demotion of an employee; or
(iii)  any other form of retaliation against an employee in the terms,
privileges, or conditions of employment.
(2) (a)  An employee claiming to be aggrieved by an action of the employer in
violation of Subsection (1) may file with the division a request for agency
action.
(b)  On receipt of a request for agency action under Subsection (2)(a), the
division:
(i)  shall conduct an adjudicative proceeding pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act; and
(ii)  may attempt to reach a settlement between the parties through a
settlement conference.
(3)  If the division determines that a violation has occurred, the division
may require the employer to:
(a)  cease and desist any retaliatory action;
(b)  compensate the employee, which compensation may not exceed reimbursement
for, and payment of, lost wages and benefits to the employee; or
(c)  do both (3)(a) and (b).
(4)  The division may enforce this section in accordance with Subsections
34-28-9(3) and (4).
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall adopt rules, as required, to implement this section.
